incubator/apertium-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="ज्/ओ__प्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओ</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओ</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसका</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसके</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसके</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसके</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसकी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसकी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसकी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसकी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनका</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनके</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनके</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनके</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनकी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनकी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनकी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनकी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इस</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसने</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसे</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसको</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इससे</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसमें</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसपर</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इन</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इन्होंने</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इन्हें</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनको</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनसे</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनमें</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इनपर</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="जो"><i>ज्</i><par n="ज्/ओ__प्"/></e>
